Utah statutes.
67-19-12.1.   Department of Financial Institutions pay plans.

To allow the state to recruit and retain the highest qualified examiners and regulators to oversee the financial services industry in this state and ensure parity with officials and employees of federal regulatory agencies and entities performing substantially similar jobs, the pay plans for all examiners and supervisors specified in Title 7, Chapter 1, Article 2, Department of Financial Institutions, shall comply with Section 67-19-12, except that the market comparability study of state salary ranges for these positions shall be based on a survey of salary ranges of federal regulatory agencies and organizations responsible for regulating financial institutions chartered and regulated by the commissioner of financial institutions, including the:

(1)  Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

(2)  Federal Reserve; and

(3)  National Credit Union Administration.



Enacted by Chapter 338, 2006 General Session

